California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(2) (A) A local publicly owned electric utility that does not have the necessary system to implement the requirements of subdivision (a) shall, on or before March 1, 2028, develop a plan to update its system to automatically enroll its customers in alerts for electrical service outages and updates.

(B) If the governing board of the local publicly owned electric utility determines the plan developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) is cost effective, the local publicly owned electric utility shall implement the plan during the next significant, planned upgrade of its system or by March 1, 2030, whichever is sooner.

(c) Customers shall be provided with the opportunity to opt-out of alerts for service outages and updates that the customer does not wish to receive, except for required or essential notifications.

(d) Each utility shall annually provide information on a customer’s
 bill on how to update the customer’s preferred contact method and shall allow a customer to update the customer’s contact information on the utility’s internet website
 or, if feasible, by telephone.

(e) For purposes of this section, “utility” means an electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218, a local publicly owned electric utility, as defined in Section 224.3, a gas corporation, as defined in Section 222, or a water corporation, as defined in Section 241.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 396, Sec. 1.   (AB 1410)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4.8. PUBLICLY OWNED UTILITIES [9500. - 9520.]



PART 1. Low-Income Weatherization Programs [9500. - 9508.5.]

9500.

(a) Each publicly owned electric and gas utility that provides the energy for space heating for low-income customers shall also provide home weatherization services for those customers if a significant need for those services exists in the utility’s service territory, as determined by the utility, taking into consideration both the cost-effectiveness of the services and the public policy of reducing financial hardships facing low-income households. Publicly owned utilities shall not have to duplicate low-income home weatherization services provided by gas and electrical corporations serving the same service territory.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “weatherization” includes, where feasible, any of the following measures for any dwelling unit:

(A) Attic insulation.

(B) Caulking.

(C) Weatherstripping.

(D) Low flow showerhead.

(E) Waterheater blanket.

(F) Door and building envelope repairs which reduce air infiltration.

(2) Each publicly owned electric and gas utility shall provide as many of these measures as it determines to be feasible and cost-effective for each eligible low-income dwelling unit.

(c) “Weatherization” may also include other building conservation measures, energy-efficient appliances, and energy education programs determined by the utility to be feasible, taking into consideration both the cost-effectiveness of the measures and the public policy of reducing the financial hardships facing low-income households.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 809, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9501.

Each publicly owned electric and gas utility shall develop and implement its low-income home weatherization program, in consultation with gas and electrical corporations and the Department of Economic Opportunity, to avoid duplication and to ensure the most efficient use of public and private resources. For ratemaking purposes, gas and electrical corporation expenditures for consultation and coordination shall be recoverable from ratepayers, subject to the Public Utilities Commission’s authority to determine the reasonableness of the amount of the expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 809, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9503.

Upon the completion and promulgation of regulations pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25943 of the Public Resources Code, each governing body of a local publicly owned electric utility, as defined in Section 224.3, shall be responsible for implementing an energy efficiency program that recognizes the intent of the Legislature to encourage energy savings and greenhouse gas emission reductions in existing residential and nonresidential buildings, while taking into consideration the effect of the program on rates, reliability, and financial resources.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 385.2 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 606, Sec. 4.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9505.

(a) By March 15, 2013, and by March 15 of each year thereafter, each local publicly owned electric utility shall report to the Energy Commission and to its customers all of the following:

(1) Its investments in energy efficiency and demand reduction programs.

(2) A description of each energy efficiency and demand reduction program, program expenditures, the cost-effectiveness of each program, and expected and actual energy efficiency savings and demand reduction results that reflect the intent of the Legislature to encourage energy savings and reductions in emissions of greenhouse gases resulting from providing service to
 existing residential and nonresidential buildings, while taking into consideration the effect of the program on rates, reliability, and financial resources.

(3) The sources for funding of its energy efficiency and demand reduction programs.

(4) The methodologies and input assumptions used to determine the cost-effectiveness of its energy efficiency and demand reduction programs.

(5) A comparison of the local publicly owned electric utility’s annual targets established pursuant to subdivision (b) and the local publicly owned electric utility’s reported electricity efficiency savings and demand reductions.

(b) By March 15, 2013, and by March 15 of every fourth year thereafter,
 each local publicly owned electric utility shall identify all potentially achievable cost-effective electricity efficiency savings and shall establish annual targets for energy efficiency savings and demand reduction for the next 10-year period, consistent with the annual targets established by the Energy Commission pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25310 of the Public Resources Code. A local publicly owned electric utility’s determination of potentially achievable cost-effective electricity efficiency savings shall be made without regard to previous minimum investments undertaken pursuant to Section 385. A local publicly owned electric utility shall treat investments made to achieve energy efficiency savings and demand reduction targets as procurement investments.

(c) Within 60 days of establishing annual targets pursuant to subdivision
 (b), each local publicly owned electric utility shall report those targets to the Energy Commission, and the basis for establishing those targets.

(d) Each local publicly owned electric utility shall make available to its customers and to the Energy Commission the results of any independent evaluation that measures and verifies the energy efficiency savings and the reduction in energy demand achieved by its energy efficiency and demand reduction programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 547, Sec. 33.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

9506.

(a) A local publicly owned electric utility shall report to the Energy Commission regarding the energy storage system procurement targets and policies adopted by the governing board pursuant to paragraph (2) of, and report any modifications made to those targets as a result of a reevaluation undertaken pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 2836.

(b) By January 1, 2017, a local publicly owned electric utility shall submit a report to the Energy Commission demonstrating that it has complied with the energy storage system procurement targets and policies adopted by the governing board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2836.

(c) By January 1, 2021, a local publicly owned electric
 utility shall submit a report to the Energy Commission demonstrating that it has complied with the energy storage system procurement targets and policies adopted by the governing board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2836.

(d) The Energy Commission shall ensure that a copy of each report or plan required by subdivisions (b) and (c), with any confidential information redacted, is available on the Energy Commission’s Internet Web site, or on an Internet Web site maintained by the local publicly owned electric utility that can be accessed from the Energy Commission’s Internet Web site.

(e) A summary of the reports required by this section shall be included as part of each integrated energy policy report required pursuant to Section 25302 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 181.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9507.

(a) For purposes of this section, “eligible renewable energy resource” and “renewables portfolio standard” have the same meanings as for the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1).

(b) Every local publicly owned electric utility shall annually disclose, to end-use customers, all of the following:

(1) Its electricity sources for
 the previous calendar year, consistent with information provided to the Energy Commission pursuant to Section 398.4.

(2) The utility’s progress toward attaining the renewables portfolio standard established pursuant to Section 399.30.

(3) Expenditures for development of eligible renewable energy resources, including a description of programs, sources of funding, expected results, and actual results.

(c) A local publicly owned electric utility shall, on an annual basis, make available to its customers information relating to the utility’s solar initiative program established pursuant to Section 2854, including the rated generating capacity of installed solar energy systems receiving monetary incentives
 through the utility’s program, the total number of solar energy systems installed, the total number of applications for the utility’s program, the amount of monetary incentives awarded, and the contribution toward the program goals of the California Solar Initiative (Article 1 (commencing with Section 2851) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 of Division 1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 606, Sec. 14.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9508.

(a) In developing the rules and procedures specified in this section and in Section 9507, the Energy Commission shall seek to minimize the reporting burden and cost of reporting that it imposes on local publicly owned electric utilities.

(b) A local publicly owned electric utility shall annually submit to the Energy Commission documentation regarding eligible renewable energy resources procurement contracts that it executed during the prior year, as follows:

(1) A description of the eligible renewable energy resource, including the duration of the contract or electricity purchase agreement.

(2) A
 description and identification of the electrical generating facility providing the eligible renewable energy resource under the contract.

(3) An estimate of the percentage increase in the utility’s total retail sales of electricity from eligible renewable energy resources that will result from the contract.

(c) A local publicly owned electric utility shall annually submit to the Energy Commission documentation regarding the utility’s progress toward attaining the renewables portfolio standard established pursuant to Section 399.30.

(d) A local publicly owned electric utility shall, on an annual basis, make available to the Legislature and the Energy Commission information relating to the utility’s solar initiative program established pursuant to Section 2854, including the rated generating capacity of installed solar
 energy systems receiving monetary incentives through the utility’s program, the total number of solar energy systems installed, the total number of applications for the utility’s program, the amount of monetary incentives awarded, and the contribution toward the program goals of the California Solar Initiative (Article 1 (commencing with Section 2851) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 of Division 1).

(e) For the purposes of this section, “eligible renewable energy resource,” “renewables portfolio standard,” and “procure” have the same meanings as these terms have in the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 677, Sec. 8.   (SB 1393)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9508.5.

A local publicly owned electric utility serving end-use customers shall, upon request, provide the Energy Commission with any information the Energy Commission determines is necessary to evaluate the progress made by the local publicly owned electric utility in meeting the requirements of Section 9620.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 606, Sec. 16.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. Utility Poles and Support Structures [9510. - 9520.]

9510.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that in order to promote wireline and wireless broadband access and adoption, it is in the interest of the state to ensure that local publicly owned electric utilities, including irrigation districts, that own or control utility poles and support structures, including ducts and conduits, make available appropriate space and capacity on and in those structures to cable television corporations, video service providers, and telephone corporations under reasonable rates, terms, and conditions.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that the oversight of fees and other requirements imposed by local publicly owned electric utilities as a condition of providing
 the space or capacity described in subdivision (a) is a matter of statewide interest and concern. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that this part supersedes all conflicting local laws and this part shall apply in charter cities. 

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that local publicly owned electric utilities should provide access to utility poles and support structures with a recovery of actual costs without subsidizing for-profit cable television corporations, video service providers, and telephone corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9510.5.

As used in this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

 (a) “Communications service provider” means a cable television corporation, video service provider, or telephone corporation.

(b) “Governing body” means the governing body of a local publicly owned electric utility, including, where applicable, a board appointed by a city council. 

(c) “Street light pole” means a pole, arm, or fixture used primarily for street, pedestrian, or security lighting.

(d) “Utility pole” means an electricity or telephone pole, but does not include a street light pole or an electricity pole used solely for the transmission of electricity at 50 kilovolts or higher and not intended for distribution of communications signals or electricity at lower voltages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9511.

(a) A local publicly owned electric utility shall make appropriate space and capacity on and in a utility pole and support structure owned or controlled by the local publicly owned electric utility available for use by a communications service provider pursuant to reasonable terms and conditions. Rates, terms, and conditions that are specified in a contract
 executed before January 1, 2012, shall remain valid until the contract, rate, term, or condition expires or is terminated according to its terms by one of the parties. If an annual fee is included in a contract executed before January 1, 2012, but the amount of the fee is left unspecified, the requirements of Section 9512 apply.

(b) (1) A local publicly owned electric utility shall respond to a request for use by a
 communications service provider of a utility pole or support structure owned or controlled by the local publicly owned electric utility within 45 days of the date of receipt of the request, or 60 days if the request is to attach to over 300 poles. If the request is denied, the local publicly owned electric utility shall provide in the response the reason for the denial and the remedy to gain access to the utility pole or support structure. If a request to attach is accepted, the local publicly owned electric utility, within 14 days after acceptance of the request, shall provide a cost estimate, based on actual cost, for any necessary make-ready work required to accommodate the attachment. The requesting party shall accept or reject the make-ready cost estimate within 14 days. Within 60 days of acceptance of the cost estimate, the local publicly owned electric utility shall notify any existing third-party attachers that make-ready work for a new attacher needs to be
 performed. The requesting party shall have the responsibility to coordinate with third-party existing attachers for make-ready work to be completed. All parties shall complete all make-ready work within 60 days of the notice, or within 105 days in the case of a request to attach to over 300 poles. The local publicly owned electric utility may complete make-ready work without the consent of the existing attachers, if the existing attachers fail to move their attachments by the end of the make-ready timeline requirements specified in this paragraph.

(2) The timelines described in paragraph
 (1) may be extended under special circumstances upon agreement of the local publicly owned electric utility and the communications service provider.

(c) A local publicly owned electric utility may deny an application for use of a utility pole or support structure because of insufficient capacity or safety, reliability, or engineering concerns. In denying an
 application, a local publicly owned electric utility may also take into account the manner in which a request from a communications service provider under this part could impact an approved project for future use by the local publicly owned electric utility of its utility poles or support structures for delivery of its core utility service.

(d) This part does not limit the authority of a local publicly owned electric utility to ensure compliance with all applicable provisions of law in determining whether to approve or disapprove use of a utility pole or support structure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9511.5.

(a) If a local publicly owned electric utility has the authority pursuant to other law to impose a fee to provide the use described in Section 9511, that fee shall be adopted and levied consistent with the requirements of this part.

(b) The governing body of the local publicly owned electric utility shall determine the fee pursuant to Section 9512.

(c) This part
 does not grant additional authority to a local publicly owned electric utility to impose a fee that is not otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9512.

(a) (1) An annual fee charged by a local publicly owned electric utility for the use of a utility pole by a communications service provider shall not exceed an amount determined by multiplying the percentage of the total usable space that would be occupied by the attachment by the annual costs of ownership of the pole and its supporting anchor. As used in this paragraph and paragraph (2), “usable space” means the space above the minimum grade level that can be used for the
 attachment of wires, cables, and associated equipment. It shall be presumed, subject to factual rebuttal, that a single attachment occupies one foot of usable space and that an average utility pole contains 13.5 feet of usable space.

(2) An annual fee charged by a local publicly owned electric utility for use of a support structure by a communications service provider shall not exceed the local publicly owned electric utility’s annual costs of ownership of the percentage of the volume of the capacity of the structure rendered unusable by the equipment of the
 communications service provider.

(3) As used in this subdivision, the “annual costs of ownership” is the sum of the annual capital costs and annual operation costs of the pole or support structure, which shall be the average costs of all similar utility poles or structures owned or controlled by the local publicly owned electric utility. The basis for the computation of annual capital costs shall be historical capital costs less depreciation. The accounting upon which the historical capital costs are determined shall include a credit for all reimbursed capital costs. Depreciation shall be based upon the average service life of the utility pole or support structure. “Annual cost of ownership” does not include costs for any property not necessary for use by the
 communications service provider.

(b) A local publicly owned electric utility shall not levy a fee that exceeds the estimated amount required to provide use of the utility pole or support structure for which the annual recurring fee is levied. If the fee creates revenues in excess of actual costs, those revenues shall be used to reduce the fee.

(c) A jointly owned pole is not included within the requirements of this section, if a joint owner other than the local publicly owned electric utility has
 control of access to the space that would be used by the communications service provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9513.

(a) A local publicly owned electric utility may require an additional one-time charge equal to three years of the annual fee described in Section 9512, for attachments reasonably shown to have been made without authorization that are discovered on or after January 1, 2012.

(b) A local publicly owned electric utility may remove an attachment made without authorization, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The owner of the attachment fails to pay the charge described in subdivision (a), if that charge is applicable.

(2) The
 owner of the attachment does not seek approval to attach pursuant to this part within a reasonable period of time.

(3) The owner of the attachment does not contest that the attachment was made without authorization.

(c) An attachment of a service drop wire is not made without authorization for the purposes of this section, if the owner of the attachment seeks approval to attach pursuant to this part within 45 days of the attachment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9514.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit a local publicly owned electric utility from requiring a one-time fee to process a request for attachment, if the one-time fee does not exceed the actual cost of processing the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9515.

(a) In the event that it becomes necessary for the local publicly owned electric utility to use space or capacity on or in a support structure occupied by the communications service provider’s equipment, the communications service provider shall either pay all costs for rearrangements necessary to maintain the pole attachment or remove its equipment at its own expense. 

(b) If the communications service provider requests a rearrangement of the utility pole or support structure, and the local publicly owned electric utility has the authority to levy fees as described in Section 9511.5, the local publicly owned electric utility may charge a one-time reimbursement fee for the actual costs incurred for the rearrangement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9516.

(a) (1) Before adopting, or increasing, a fee described in this part, or adopting or changing the terms and conditions of access subject to this part, the local publicly owned electric utility shall hold at least one open and public meeting as part of a regularly scheduled meeting, at which time oral or written presentations relating to the fee or
 term or condition of access may be made.

(2) At least 14 days before the meeting described in paragraph (1), the local publicly owned electric utility shall mail notice of the time and place of the meeting, including a general explanation of the matter to be considered, and a statement that the data required by paragraph (3) is available, to a person or entity who files a written request with the local publicly owned electric utility for mailed notice of the meeting.

(3) At least 10 days before the meeting described in paragraph (1), the local publicly owned electric utility shall make available to the public data indicating the cost, or estimated cost, to make utility poles and support structures available for use by a
 communications service provider, if adopting or increasing a fee, and shall make available data and rationale for adopting or changing the terms and conditions of access, if adopting or changing the terms and conditions of access. 

(b) (1) An action by a local publicly owned electric utility to adopt, or increase, a fee described in this part, or adopt or change the terms and conditions of access subject to this part, shall be taken solely by an ordinance or resolution adopted, or by a contract approved, by the
 governing
 body of the local publicly owned electric utility. The governing body of the local publicly owned electric utility shall not delegate the authority to adopt or increase the fee or term or condition of access to another entity or board or an official or employee of the board. This subdivision does not restrict a city council’s existing authority over a governing body appointed by the city council. The governing body of the local publicly owned electric utility shall ensure that the customers of the local publicly owned electric utility and the customers of the
 communications service provider are not subsidized by the rates, terms, and conditions proposed for access pursuant to this part.

(2) The governing body of the local publicly owned electric utility shall approve the ordinance or resolution or contract to adopt or increase the fee, or adopt or change the terms and conditions of access subject to this part, at a subsequent open and public meeting as part of a regularly scheduled meeting, no earlier than 30 days after the initial public meeting described in subdivision (a).

(3) An action adopting a fee or increasing a fee, or adopting or changing the terms and conditions of access subject to
 this part, pursuant to this section shall be effective no sooner than 60 days following the final action on the adoption of the fee or fee increase or adoption or change in the terms and conditions of access.

(c) This section does not apply to a contract extension agreed to by all of the parties to the contract, if the terms, conditions, or rates described in the contract are not changed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9517.

(a) Any person or entity may protest the adoption or imposition of, or increase of, a fee described in this part, or adoption or change in the terms and conditions of access subject to this part, by serving written notice to the governing body of the local publicly owned electric utility within 30 days of the action taken. The written notice shall contain a statement
 informing the governing body of the factual elements of the dispute and the legal theory forming the basis for the protest.

(b) The filing of protest pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be a basis for the local publicly owned electric utility to withhold approval of the use of a utility pole or support structure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9518.

(a) A judicial action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul an ordinance, resolution, motion, or contract adopting, or increasing, a fee described in this part, or adopting or changing the terms and conditions of access subject to this part, or an automatic adjustment that results in an increase in the amount of a fee described in
 this part, shall be commenced within 120 days of the effective date of the ordinance, resolution, motion, contract, or automatic adjustment.

(b) An action by a local publicly owned electric utility or interested person shall be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) A person or entity shall not initiate an action or proceeding pursuant to subdivision (a) unless both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The fee or requirement will be directly imposed on the person or entity as a condition for the use of a utility pole or support structure, or the entity is a trade association that represents that person or entity.

(2) At least 30
 days before initiating the action or proceeding, the person or entity, or trade association representing that person or entity, requests the local publicly owned electric utility to provide a copy of documents that purport to establish that the fee does not exceed the amount reasonably necessary to cover the cost of the use of the utility pole or support structure, consistent with this part, or that the term and conditions of access or change to the terms and conditions of access are reasonable. The local publicly owned electric utility may charge a fee for the direct costs of copying the documents requested pursuant to this paragraph.

(d) An action to enforce this part shall be brought in a court of competent
 jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9519.

(a) A person or entity, or trade association representing that person or entity, may request an audit in order to determine whether a fee described in this part exceeds the amount reasonably necessary to cover the costs to the utility of the use of a utility pole or support structure, consistent with
 this part. A person or entity making that request shall retain an independent auditor to conduct an audit to determine whether the fee is reasonable, unless an audit has been performed for the same fee within the previous 12 months. The individual or entity requesting the audit shall pay for the direct costs associated with an audit made pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) A person or entity, or trade association representing a person or entity, shall not request an audit unless the fee is directly imposed on the person or entity, or on a member of the trade association, as a condition for the use of the utility pole or support structure.

(c) To the extent that the audit determines that the amount of the fee does not meet the requirements of this part, the local publicly owned electric utility shall adjust the fee accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9520.

(a) Nothing in this part alters the ability of a local publicly owned electric utility to determine who performs work for the local publicly owned electric utility on its facilities. 

(b) The use of a utility pole or support structure by a
 communications service provider
 shall comply with Public Utilities Commission General Orders 95 and 128 and all other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4.9. RESTRUCTURING OF PUBLICLY OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITIES IN CONNECTION WITH THE RESTRUCTURING OF THE ELECTRICAL SERVICES INDUSTRY [9600. - 9625.]

9600.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that California’s local publicly owned electric utilities and electric corporations should commit control of their transmission facilities to the Independent System Operator as described in Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 330) of Part 1 of Division 1. These utilities should jointly advocate to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission a pricing methodology for the Independent System Operator that results in an equitable return on capital investment in transmission facilities for all Independent System Operator participants and is based on the following principles:

(1) Utility specific access charge rates as proposed in Docket No. EC96-19-000 as finally approved by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission reflecting the costs of that utility’s transmission facilities shall go into effect on the first day of the Independent System Operator operation. The utility specific rates shall honor all of the terms and conditions of existing transmission service contracts and shall recognize any wheeling revenues of existing transmission service arrangements to the transmission owner.

(2) (A) No later than two years after the initial operation of the Independent System Operator, the Independent System Operator shall recommend for adoption by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission a rate methodology determined by a decision of the Independent System Operator governing board, provided that the decision shall be based on principles approved by the governing board including, but not limited to, an equitable balance of costs and benefits, and shall define the transmission facility costs, if any, which shall be rolled in to the transmission service rate and spread equally among all Independent System Operator transmission users, and those transmission facility costs, if any, which should be specifically assigned to a specific utility’s service area.

(B) If there is no governing board decision, the rate methodology shall be determined following a decision by the alternative dispute resolution method set forth in the Independent System Operator bylaws.

(C) If no alternative dispute resolution decision is rendered, then a default rate methodology shall be a uniform regional transmission access charge and a utility specific local transmission access charge, provided that the default rate methodology shall be recommended for implementation upon termination of the cost recovery plan set forth in Section 368 or no later than two years after the initial operation of the Independent System Operator, whichever is later. For purposes of this paragraph, regional transmission facilities are defined to be transmission facilities operating at or above 230 kilovolts plus an appropriate percentage of transmission facilities operating below 230 kilovolts; all other transmission facilities shall be considered local. The appropriate percentage of transmission facilities described above shall be consistent with the guidelines in Federal Energy Regulatory Commission Order No. 888 and any exception approved by that commission.

(3) If the rate methodology implemented as a result of a decision by the Independent System Operator governing board or resulting from the independent system operator alternative dispute resolution process results in rates different than those in effect prior to the decision for any transmission facility owner, the amount of any differences between the new rates and the prior rates shall be recorded in a tracking account to be recovered from customers and paid to the appropriate transmission owners by the transmission facility owner after termination of the cost recovery plan set forth in Section 368. The recovery and payments shall be based on an amortization period not to exceed three years in the case of the electrical corporations or five years in the case of the local publicly owned electric utilities.

(4) The costs of transmission facilities placed in service after the date of initial implementation of the Independent System Operator shall be recovered using the rate methodology in effect at the time the facilities go into operation.

(5) The electrical corporations and the local publicly owned electric utilities shall jointly develop language for implementation proposals to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission based on these principles.

(6) Nothing in this section shall compel any party to violate restrictions applicable to facilities financed with tax-exempt bonds or contractual restrictions and covenants regarding use of transmission facilities existing as of December 20, 1995.

(b) Following a final Federal Energy Regulatory Commission decision approving the Independent System Operator, no California electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility shall be authorized to collect any competition transition charge authorized pursuant to this division and Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 330) of Part 1 of Division 1 unless it commits control of its transmission facilities to the Independent System Operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 12.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9601.

(a) Except with respect to supply options of the nature specified in Section 218, with the exception of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of that section, as it existed on December 20, 1995, no person, corporation, electrical corporation, or local publicly owned electric utility or other governmental entity other than a retail customer’s existing electric service provider as of December 20, 1995, shall provide partial or full electric service to a retail customer of a local publicly owned electric utility unless the customer first confirms in writing an obligation to pay, through tariff or otherwise, to the utility currently providing electric service, a nonbypassable generation-related severance fee or transition charge established by the regulatory body for that utility. The severance fee or transition charge shall be paid directly to the local publicly owned utility providing electricity service in the service area in which the consumer is located.
